Mississippi, session 2026, HB1284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) In the State of Mississippi, in which are located, as of January 1, 2026, fifteen (15) community and junior college districts, there shall be an administrative consolidation of six (6) of those districts, effectively reducing the number to twelve (12) such districts, which are further identified and enumerated, accordingly in subsection (2) of this section and Section 37-29-31. (2)  For purposes of this act the consolidation shall impact the following community college districts, with regard to the composition of boards of trustees, administrative leadership and the transfers of duties, responsibilities and property.  Effective on July 1, 2027: (a)  The Mississippi Delta Community College District shall be consolidated with the Coahoma Community College District, and shall officially be known as the Mississippi Delta Community College District.  The central administrative offices shall be located in Clarksdale, Mississippi, and the college's administrative leadership shall consist of those officers serving in said capacities for Coahoma Community College as that district existed on July 1, 2026.  At that time, Coahoma Community College shall be known as the Coahoma Campus of Mississippi Delta Community College.  The board of trustees for the newly consolidated Mississippi Delta Community College District shall consist of seventeen (17) members, with two (2) members appointed by the county board of supervisors of each county comprising the district as prescribed in Section 37-29-31, and one (1) member appointed by the members of the board of trustees.  Once appointed, the new board of trustees shall determine the initial terms of office for each member ranging from (1) to five (5) years.  Thereafter, all  members shall be appointed for a designated term of five (5) years in order to prevent the term expiration of more than one (1) member of any one (1) county in any one (1) year.  The members appointed by the county boards of supervisors shall be appointed in accordance with the qualifications established in Section 37-29-65(6). The member appointed by the board of trustees shall alternate terms between Bolivar, Coahoma and Washington Counties, The first board-appointed member shall be appointed from Coahoma County, and succeeded by an appointee from Washington and then Bolivar Counties; (b)  The East Mississippi Community College District shall be consolidated with the Meridian Community College District, and shall officially be known as the East Mississippi Community College District.  The central administrative offices shall be located in Scooba, Mississippi, and the college's administrative leadership shall consist of those officers serving in said capacities for East Mississippi Community College as that district existed on July 1, 2026.  At that time, Meridian Community College shall be known as the Meridian Campus of East Mississippi Community College.  The board of trustees for the newly consolidated East Mississippi Community College District shall consist of fourteen (14) members, comprised of the two (2) members appointed by the county board of supervisors of each county comprising the district as prescribed in Section 37-29-31 and serving on June 1, 2026, each of whom shall continue to serve until the natural expiration of their appointment term, and two (2) members appointed by the City Council of the City of Meridian, whose terms of office shall begin on July 1, 2027.  Once appointed, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member appointed by the City Council of the City of Meridian as two (2) or four (4) years. Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a designated term of five (5) years in order to prevent the term expiration of more than one (1) member of any one (1) county in any one (1) year.  Members appointed by the city council and the county boards of supervisors shall be appointed in accordance with the qualifications established in Section 37-29-65(6); and (c)  The Copiah-Lincoln Community College District shall be consolidated with the Southwest Mississippi Community College District, and shall officially be known as the Copiah-Lincoln Community College District.  The central administrative offices shall be located in Wesson, Mississippi, and the college's administrative leadership shall consist of those officers serving in said capacities for Copiah-Lincoln Community College as that district existed on July 1, 2026.  At that time, Southwest Community College shall be known as the Summit Campus of Copiah-Lincoln Community College.  The board of trustees for the newly consolidated Copiah-Lincoln Community College District shall consist of twenty-seven (27) members, with three (3) members appointed by each of the county board of supervisors for Adams, Copiah, Lincoln, Pike and Simpson Counties, and two (2) members appointed by each of the county board of supervisors for Amite, Franklin, Jefferson, Lawrence, Walthall and Wilkinson, whose terms of office shall begin on July 1, 2027.  Once appointed, those counties having three (3) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as one (1), three (3) or five (5) years.  Once appointed, those counties having two (2) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as two (2) or four (4) years.  Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a designated term of five (5) years.  Members shall be appointed in accordance with the qualifications established in Section 37-29-65(6). (d)  All vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms by appointment by a majority vote of the original appointing governing authority. (3)  (a)  On or before December 31, 2026, the Mississippi Community College Board shall serve the boards of trustees of each community college district scheduled for consolidation with notice and instructions regarding the timetable for action to be taken to comply with the administrative consolidation required in this section.  The Mississippi Community College Board shall provide for the administrative consolidation of those community college districts identified in subsection (2) of this section on or before July 1, 2027.  The Mississippi Community College Board shall declare that the territory embraced by counties forming each consolidated community college district shall be the boundary lines for the territory of those and shall spread a legal description of the new community college districts on the minutes of its January 2027 meeting and shall serve the applicable county boards of supervisors with an adequate legal description of these new boundaries. (b)  It shall be the responsibility of the board of supervisors of each county within a specific community college district to provide for the financial support of the community college district to which it is assigned.  The board of supervisors of the county shall thereafter publish the same in some newspaper of general circulation in the county for at least three (3) consecutive weeks and after having given notice of publication. (c)  Any community college district affected by the required administrative consolidation in the community college districts identified in subsection (2) of this section that does not voluntarily consolidate as ordered by the Mississippi Community College Board shall be administratively consolidated by the Mississippi Community College Board, to be effective on July 1, 2027.  The Mississippi Community College Board shall promptly move on its own motion to administratively consolidate a community college district which does not voluntarily consolidate in order to enable the affected community college districts to reasonably accomplish the resulting administrative consolidation by July 1, 2027.  The affected community college districts shall comply with any consolidation order issued by the Mississippi Community College Board on or before July 1, 2027. (4)  (a)  On July 1, 2027, following the consolidation of the  community college districts identified in subsection (2) of this section, the former boards of trustees of those community college districts shall be abolished.  All real and personal property which is owned or titled in the name of the community college district located in such former community college districts shall be transferred to the new community college district to which it has been consolidated. (b)  The new boards of trustees of the consolidated community college districts shall be responsible for establishing the contracts for administrators, instructors, clerical and administrative staff personnel for the 2027-2028 school year and each school year thereafter. (c)  The presidents of the colleges with each community college district may recommend for employment, with approval by the boards of trustees, vice presidents of colleges and campuses for the district, and shall employ as many such individuals to administer the daily operations of such colleges and campuses.  It shall be the responsibility of the successor board of trustees to prepare and approve the budget of the new consolidated community college district, and the successor board of trustees may use staff from the former community college district with which it has been consolidated to prepare the budget.  Any proposed order of the Mississippi Community College Board directing the transfer of the assets, real or personal property of an affected community college district in the county, shall be final and conclusive for the purposes of the transfer of property required by such administrative consolidation. (d)  Any person or community college district aggrieved by an order of the successor newly selected board of trustees of the Copiah County Community college district pursuant to the required administrative consolidation may appeal therefrom within ten (10) days from the date of the adjournment of the meeting at which such order is entered.  The appeal shall be taken in the same manner as appeals are taken from judgments or decisions of the board of supervisors as provided in Section 11-51-75, the provisions of which shall be fully applicable to appeals taken hereunder.  The board of trustees of the newly community college district against whom the grievance is made shall not pass upon or approve or disapprove any such order until the time for an appeal therefrom has expired, nor shall the board pass upon or approve or disapprove any such order from which an appeal is taken until said appeal has been finally determined. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the closing of any college or facility, unless the facility is an unneeded administrative office located within a community college district which has been abolished under the provisions of this section.  The Mississippi Community College Board shall promulgate rules and regulations to facilitate the administrative consolidation of the community college districts pursuant to this section. SECTION 2.  Section 37-29-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-31.  (1)  There are hereby created the following community or junior college districts comprising the entire counties therein named and having boundaries coinciding with the external boundaries thereof, each of which shall be separate juristic entities and bodies politic and corporate: (a)  East Central * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Leake, Neshoba, Newton, Scott and Winston. (b)  East Mississippi * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Clay, Kemper, Lauderdale, Lowndes, Noxubee and Oktibbeha. (c)  Hinds * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Hinds, Rankin, Warren and Claiborne. (d)  Holmes * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Attala, Carroll, Choctaw, Grenada, Holmes, Madison, Montgomery, Webster and Yazoo. (e)  Itawamba * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Chickasaw, Itawamba, Lee, Monroe and Pontotoc. (f)  Jones County Junior College District shall be comprised of the counties of Clarke, Covington, Greene, Jasper, Jones, Perry, Smith and Wayne. (g)  * * *Mississippi Delta Junior Coahoma Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Bolivar, Coahoma, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Sharkey, Sunflower and Washington. (h)  Northeast * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Alcorn, Prentiss, Tippah, Tishomingo and Union. (i)  Northwest * * *Junior Community College District shall be comprised of the counties of Benton, Calhoun, DeSoto, Lafayette, Marshall, Panola, Quitman, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica and Yalobusha. (j)  Pearl River Junior College District shall be comprised of the counties of Forrest, Hancock, Jefferson Davis, Lamar, Marion and Pearl River. (k)  * * *Southwest Junior Copiah-Lincoln College District shall be comprised of the counties of Adams, Amite, Copiah, Franklin, Jefferson, Lawrence, Lincoln, Pike, Simpson, Walthall and Wilkinson. (j)  Mississippi Gulf Coast Community College shall be comprised of the counties of George, Harrison, Jackson and Stone. (2)  The boards of supervisor of each county belonging to a community college district, shall only provide the amount of any millage levied for the support and maintenance of the community college district to which the county is assigned such county under Section 37-29-141.  No county shall contribute to more than one (1) community college district. SECTION 3.  Section 37-29-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-65.  (1)  Except as provided in this section and in Sections 37-29-409, 37-29-457 and 37-29-505, there shall be five (5) trustees from each county of the community/junior college district which originally entered into and gave financial aid in establishing the community/junior college.  On June 30, 1992, the offices of the six (6) trustees from each of the original counties in the Northwest Community College District shall stand vacated.  The board of supervisors of those respective counties shall appoint two (2) members on July 1, 1992, to serve full terms of office as provided in this section.  The board of supervisors of those respective counties shall appoint one (1) member who is a qualified elector from each supervisors district to serve as a member, either of which may be the county superintendent of education if he or she resides in a respective supervisors district.  Counties which subsequent to the establishment of the community/junior college joined the district shall have only one (1) trustee.  However, the board of trustees so constituted, by appropriate resolution, may enlarge its number to six (6) trustees from each county.  The board of trustees shall also be authorized within its discretion to reduce its number to two (2) trustees at large from each county.  In any case in which there is an equal number of trustees the board of trustees may appoint another person to membership. (2)  The county superintendent, if appointed by the county board of supervisors, may, in his discretion, choose not to serve as a member of such board of trustees.  Such decision not to serve shall be in writing and entered on the minutes of the board of trustees of the community/junior college district.  The county board of supervisors of any county whose county superintendent of education appointed under the authority of this section, declines the appointment or resigns, pursuant to this subsection (2), shall fill the vacancy caused by such resignation by appointing a member who is a qualified elector of the county at large in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.  No county superintendent whose community college district is located within the East Mississippi Community College District shall serve on the board of trustees for that community college district. (3)  From and after * * *March 24, 1990 July 1, 2027, the Board of Trustees of the East Mississippi Community College District shall consist of * * *twelve (12) fourteen (14) members.  The appointing authorities shall appoint a new board of trustees as follows:  Clay County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Kemper County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Lauderdale County shall be entitled to * * *two (2) four (4) members, two of whom shall be residents of the incorporated limits of the City of Meridian appointed by the city council, Lowndes County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Noxubee County shall be entitled to two (2) members and Oktibbeha County shall be entitled to two (2) members.  * * *No Members of the Board of Trustees of the East Mississippi Community College District * * *shall have served on such board prior to March 24, 1990 on the board on July 1, 2026, shall continue to serve until the natural expiration of their appointment term.  The two (2) additional appointees from Lauderdale County, representing the incorporated limits of the City of Meridian shall be appointed for a term of five (5) years. (4)  * * *The Board of Trustees of the Coahoma Community College District shall consist of nine (9) members.  The appointing authorities shall appoint the new board of trustees as follows:  Coahoma County shall be entitled to five (5) members appointed in the manner provided herein, Tunica County shall be entitled to one (1) member, Quitman County shall be entitled to one (1) member, Bolivar County shall be entitled to one (1) member, and Tallahatchie County shall be entitled to one (1) member.  Persons who are currently serving as members of the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Delta Community College District or Northwest Community College District shall be eligible for appointment to the board. From and after July 1, 2027, the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi Delta Community College District shall consist of seventeen (17) members.  The appointing authorities shall appoint a new board of trustees as follows:  Bolivar County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Coahoma County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Humphreys County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Issaquena County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Leflore County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Sharkey County shall be entitled to two (2) members, Sunflower County shall be entitled to two (2) members and Washington County shall be entitled to two (2) members.  The newly appointed board of trustees of the Mississippi Delta Community College District  shall appoint one (1) member on an alternating basis from Bolivar, Coahoma and Washington Counties for a term of five (5) years.  The first alternating appointee shall be from Coahoma County, and succeeded by an appointee from Washington and then Bolivar Counties. (5)  Except as otherwise provided in Section 1, the terms of office shall be five (5) years * * *; however, upon the first selection of trustees in each county, one (1) shall be elected for a term of five (5) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) for a term of one (1) year, so as to prevent the retirement of more than one (1) member of any one (1) county in any one (1) year.  Where the board chooses or is required by statute to reduce its number, the board shall specify the expiration dates of such terms of office in order to prevent the retirement of more than one (1) member of any one (1) county in any one (1) year. (6)  The board of supervisors shall elect the requisite number of discreet persons of good moral character, sufficient education and experience, and of proven interest in public education, who are qualified electors of the county, as trustees of the community/junior college; and annually thereafter the board of supervisors in like manner shall fill vacancies.  All trustees so appointed shall be listed in the minutes of the board of supervisors and their appointment shall be certified by the chancery clerk to the president of the community/junior college. (7)  Each community/junior college trustee may be paid, out of community/junior college funds, a per diem as authorized in Section 25-3-69, * * *Mississippi Code of 1972, per meeting of said board and, in addition thereto, the mileage authorized under Section 25-3-41, * * *Mississippi Code of 1972, per mile in coming to and returning from said meeting, calculated upon the customary and normally traveled route from the home of such trustee to the campus of said community/junior college.  Such allowance of per diem and mileage shall not, however, be allowed for more than fifteen (15) meetings for any one (1) fiscal year and shall only be paid for meetings actually attended by such trustees. (8)  The provisions of this section, other than those provisions pertaining to per diem compensation and travel allowances for community/junior college trustees, shall not apply to any existing publicly operated community/junior college, lying in and operated by a county bordering on the Mississippi River, and the community/junior college trustees of such community/junior college shall be appointed and confirmed as heretofore. (9)  No county superintendent of education, by virtue of his or her office, shall be automatically placed on the board of trustees for any community/junior college district to which this section applies.  * * *The number of trustees from each county shall be reduced by one (1) member if such member is superintendent of education.  However, if the county board of supervisors, in making an appointment to the community/junior college district board of trustees, chooses to appoint the county superintendent of education at the expiration of the term of * * *the at large a member, the superintendent may serve, unless otherwise disqualified. SECTION 4.  Section 37-29-451, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-451.  There is hereby created the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District comprised of the territory lying within Adams, Amite, Copiah, Franklin, Jefferson, Lawrence, Lincoln * * *and, Pike, Simpson, Walthall and Wilkinson Counties and having boundaries coinciding with the external boundaries thereof.  The said district shall be and is hereby constituted a legal political governmental subdivision and a body corporate.  The board of trustees of said district, with the consent of the Mississippi Community College Board, is hereby empowered to change the name of the district. SECTION 5.  Section 37-29-453, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-453.  The Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall be under the executive direction of a president elected by the board of trustees of said district for a term not to exceed four (4) years. SECTION 6.  Section 37-29-455, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-455.  The president of the * * *junior community college shall have the power to recommend to the trustees all teachers to be employed; and he may remove or suspend any member of the faculty subject to the approval of the trustees.  He shall be the general manager of all fiscal and administrative affairs of the district with full authority to select, direct, employ and discharge any and all employees other than teachers; however, the board may make provisions and establish policies for leave for faculty members and other key personnel. The president shall have the authority, subject to the provisions of Sections 37-29-451 through 37-29-471 and the approval of the trustees, to arrange and survey courses of study, fix schedules, and establish and enforce rules and discipline for the governing of teachers and students.  He shall be the general custodian of the property of the district. SECTION 7.  Section 37-29-457, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-457.  (1)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Southwest Community College District into the Copiah-Lincoln Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the operation and control of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall be vested in a board of trustees representing the * * *seven (7) eleven (11) counties lying within the district.  The said board shall consist of * * *twenty (20) twenty-seven (27) members to be chosen as follows: (a)  Copiah County shall be entitled to * * *five (5) three (3) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (b)  Lincoln County shall be entitled to * * *five (5) three (3) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualification of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (c)  Lawrence County shall be entitled to * * *one (1) two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (d)  Franklin County shall be entitled to * * *one (1) two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (e)  Simpson County shall be entitled to * * *one (1) three (3) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (f)  Jefferson County shall be entitled to * * *one (1) two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6) * * *.; (g)  Adams County shall be entitled to * * *five (5) three (3) members who shall be elected * * *from the residents of said county by the board of supervisors of Adams County within thirty (30) days of February 4, 1975. and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6); (h)  Amite County shall be entitled to two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6); (i)  Pike County shall be entitled to three (3) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6); (j)  Walthall County shall be entitled to two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6); and (k)  Wilkinson County shall be entitled to two (2) members who shall be elected and serve according to Section 1(2) of this act and the required qualifications of Section 37-29-65(6). * * *The terms of office for the members shall be five (5) years. However, upon the first selection of trustees in the county, one (1) shall be elected for a term of five (5) years, one (1) for a term of four (4) years, one (1) for a term of three (3) years, one (1) for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) for a term of one (1) year, so as to prevent the retirement of more than one (1) member in any one (1) year.  The members elected from Adams County shall have like qualifications and receive the same compensation as the members from other counties as provided by Section 37‑29‑65. As prescribed in Section 1 of this act, once appointed from those counties having three (3) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as one (1), three (3) or five (5) years.  Once appointed, those counties having two (2) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as two (2) or four (4) years.  Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a designated term of five (5) years.  Members shall be appointed in accordance with the qualifications established in Section 37-29-65(6). * * *  (h)  There shall be one (1) member of the board of trustees who shall be elected by the members of the said board of trustees from among the residents of the Copiah‑Lincoln Junior College District.  Said member so chosen shall serve a five‑year term and have the same powers and duties as the other board members. (2)  * * *Except as provided in paragraph (g) of this subsection (1), persons who are currently serving as members of the Board of Trustees of the Copiah‑Lincoln Junior College District shall complete their terms without interruption. As prescribed in Section 1 of this act, once appointed from those counties having three (3) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as one (1), three (3) or five (5) years.  Once appointed, those counties having two (2) members, the board shall determine the initial terms of office for each member as two (2) or four (4) years.  Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a designated term of five (5) years.  Members shall be appointed in accordance with the qualifications established in Section 37-29-65(6). SECTION 8.  Section 37-29-459, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-459.  The President and the Board of Trustees of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall have the powers to do all things necessary for the successful operation of said district and the campuses located therein. The several colleges of the district shall be under the direction of the board of trustees and the president.  The board of trustees shall, by resolution or order, provide for the government, maintenance and operation of each campus of the district. The President and the Board of Trustees of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall have the same powers as the presidents and trustees of other community/junior colleges in the State of Mississippi. The delineation and enumeration of the powers and purposes set out in Sections 37-29-451 through 37-29-471 shall be deemed to be supplemental and additional and shall not be construed to restrict the powers of the governing authorities of the district or of any college or campus located therein so as to deny any of the rights, privileges and powers enjoyed by other community/junior colleges and community/junior college districts in the State of Mississippi. The said Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall remain subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Mississippi Community College Board as now established or as the same may be hereafter changed by law, and shall be subject to all rules and regulations and all statutory limitations which are now in effect or may hereafter be imposed, except as the same may be in direct conflict with the provisions of Sections 37-29-451 through 37-29-471. SECTION 9.  Section 37-29-461, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-461.  There shall be * * *two (2) four (4) campuses in the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District: (a)  One (1) located in or near Natchez to be known as the Natchez Campus * * *, and the other; (b)  One (1) to located in or near Wesson to be known as the Copiah-Lincoln Campus; (c)  One (1) located in or near Mendenhall to be known as the Simpson County Center; and (d)  One (1) located in or near Summit to be known as the Summit Campus. SECTION 10.  Section 37-29-463, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-463.  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Southwest Community College District into the Copiah-Lincoln Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the board of trustees of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall each year, on or before June 15, prepare a budget which shall contain a detailed estimate of the revenues and expenses anticipated for the ensuing year for general operation and maintenance, and shall set forth the reasonable requirements for anticipated needs for capital outlays for land, buildings, initial equipment for new buildings and major repairs, a reasonable accumulation for such purposes being hereby expressly authorized. SECTION 11.  Section 37-29-465, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-465.  The board of trustees of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall have the authority to purchase property, make capital improvements, and lease or use private or public facilities at either the Copiah-Lincoln, Summit or Natchez Campuses or the Simpson County Center, in the discretion of the board. SECTION 12.  Section 37-29-467, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-467.  The Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District is charged with the responsibility for providing preprofessional courses, liberal arts, technical, vocational and adult education courses, and shall undertake to provide the same as conveniently as is possible to the residents of the district, and to this end the board of trustees is authorized and empowered to transport such students as, in its discretion, should be transported in the best interest of the district. SECTION 13.  Section 37-29-469, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-469.  The board of trustees of the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District shall have the general borrowing and bonding authority provided in Sections 37-29-101 through 37-29-127.  The said board of trustees shall have the taxation authority provided in Sections 37-29-141 through 37-29-145. SECTION 14.  Section 37-29-471, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-471.  All of the property belonging to the board of trustees of Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College and all of the property belonging to any or all of the counties, prior to and as of the effective date hereof, cooperating in the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College or the agricultural high school * * *‑junior community college located at Wesson, Mississippi, or the campus in Adams County, Mississippi, and utilized or held for the present or future use and benefit of said * * *junior community college and/or agricultural high school * * *‑junior community college, shall be and the same is hereby transferred to and vested in the Copiah-Lincoln * * *Junior Community College District as created by Sections 37-29-451 through 37-29-471. SECTION 15.  Section 37-29-501, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-501.  (1) There is hereby created a community/junior college district comprised of the territory lying within the Meridian Municipal Separate Community college district and having boundaries coinciding with the external boundaries thereof. The name of the said community/junior college district shall be the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District and the said district shall be and the same is hereby constituted a legal political governmental subdivision and a body corporate. (2)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Meridian Community College District shall be dissolved, and this section shall stand repealed. SECTION 16.  Section 37-29-503, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-503.  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, all of the property owned by the Meridian Municipal Separate Community college district utilized by Meridian * * *Junior Community College as of September 1, 1979, shall be and the same is hereby transferred to and vested in the board of trustees of the * * *Meridian Junior East Central Community College District and their successors in office for the use and benefit of the Meridian Campus of East Mississippi Community College. SECTION 17.  Section 37-29-505, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-505.  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the control and operation of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall be vested in * * *a the board of trustees * * *appointed by the city council of the City of Meridian of the East Mississippi Community College District.  The board of trustees of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District * * *shall consist of five (5) members.  When the initial appointments are made, the first appointee shall serve for a term of one (1) year, the second appointee for a term of two (2) years, the third appointee for a term of three (3) years, the fourth appointee for a term of four (4) years and the fifth appointee for a term of five (5) years; shall be dissolved on June 30, 2027, and two (2) new members appointed by the City Council of the City of Meridian shall begin their terms of service on the board of trustees for the East Mississippi Community College District on July 1, 2027, in accordance with the terms prescribed in Section 1(2) of this act, and thereafter all appointments for representation on the East Mississippi Community College District Board of Trustees shall be for a term of five (5) years.  Trustees * * *of the Meridian Junior College District shall be appointed by a majority vote of the full membership of the city council of the City of Meridian at the first meeting of the council held in the month of * * *February June of each year, and the term of office of each trustee so appointed shall commence on * * *the first Saturday of March July 1 immediately following * * *, except that the existing trustees of the Meridian Municipal Separate Community college district as of April 30, 1980, shall constitute the initial board of trustees of the Meridian Junior College District.  As the terms of these individual trustees expire, trustees for the Meridian Junior College District shall be appointed as provided herein.  All vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms by appointment by majority vote of the full membership of the city council. SECTION 18.  Section 37-29-507, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-507.  (1)  The Board of Trustees of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall have the power to do all things necessary for the successful operation of the district; and, the duties of such board shall be the general government of the district and the direction of the administration thereof. (2)  The Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall have all the powers of other * * *junior community colleges and * * *junior community college districts in the State of Mississippi; and, the delineation and enumeration of the powers and purposes set out in Sections 37-29-501 through 37-29-515 shall not be construed to restrict the powers of the governing authorities of the district so as to deny to the district any of the rights, privileges and powers enjoyed by other * * *junior community colleges and * * *junior community college districts in the State of Mississippi. (3)  The Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall remain subject to the jurisdiction and control of the Mississippi Community College Board as now established or as the same may be hereafter changed by law and shall be subject to all rules and regulations and all statutory limitations which are now in effect or may hereafter be imposed, except as the same may be in direct conflict with the provisions of Sections 37-29-501 through 37-29-515. (4)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Meridian Community College District shall be dissolved, and this section shall stand repealed. SECTION 19.  Section 37-29-509, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-509.  (1)  The Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall be under the executive direction of a president elected by the board of trustees of such district. (2)  The president of the community college shall be general manager of all fiscal and administrative affairs of the district with full authority to select, employ, direct and discharge any and all employees other than faculty.  He shall have the power to recommend to the board of trustees all faculty to be employed, and he may remove or suspend any member of the faculty subject to the approval of the board of trustees.  The president shall have the authority, subject to the approval of the board of trustees, to arrange and survey courses of study, fix schedules and establish and enforce rules and discipline for the governing of faculty and students.  He shall be the general custodian of the property of the district. (3)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Meridian Community College District shall be dissolved, and this section shall stand repealed. SECTION 20.  Section 37-29-511, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-511.  (1)  The board of trustees of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall on or before the twenty-fifth day of June each year prepare and file the annual budget of the district.  The budget shall contain a detailed estimate of the revenues and expenses anticipated for the ensuing year for general operation and maintenance and shall set forth reasonable requirements for anticipated needs for capital outlays for land, buildings, equipment and major repairs, a reasonable accumulation for such purposes being hereby expressly authorized. Funds derived from the levy for capital outlay shall be kept in a separate account and expended for capital outlay purposes only. (2)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Meridian Community College District shall be dissolved, the authority granted under subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the board of trustees of the East Mississippi Community College District. SECTION 21.  Section 37-29-513, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-513.  (1) After the annual budget has been prepared, the Board of Trustees of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall certify the same in writing to the City Council of the City of Meridian and shall certify to the number of mills of ad valorem taxation required to make provisions for the revenue required in said budget.  It shall thereupon become the duty of the City of Meridian to levy taxes upon the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District in the amount specified by the board of trustees.  The tax levy for maintenance and operation of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District shall not exceed three (3) mills nor shall the levy for construction exceed an additional three (3) mills. (2)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Meridian Community College District into the East Mississippi Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Meridian Community College District shall be dissolved, the authority granted under subsection (1) of this section shall be transferred to the board of trustees of the East Mississippi Community College District. SECTION 22.  Section 37-29-515, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-515.  On or before the thirtieth day of each month, the city council of the City of Meridian shall transmit warrants constituting all of the revenues received from taxation for the prior month for purposes of support of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District to the president of East Mississippi Community College for the use and benefit of the Meridian * * *Junior College Campus.  Such warrant or warrants shall bear indication of revenues received for general support and maintenance and revenues received for capital outlay purposes.  All such warrants evidencing income from the authorized tax levies shall be deposited forthwith in one (1) or more banking institutions and public depositories previously selected by the board of trustees of the Meridian * * *Junior Community College District serving on June 30,2026, and spread upon its official minutes.  Such funds shall be paid out of the depository by order of the board of trustees for the East Mississippi Community College District for lawful purposes only. SECTION 23.  Section 37-29-551, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-551.  There is hereby created the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District comprised of the territory lying within Bolivar County, Coahoma County, * * *Tunica County, Quitman County, Bolivar County and Tallahatchie County Humphreys County, Issaquena County, Leflore County, Sharkey County, Sunflower County and Washington County, and having boundaries coinciding with the external boundaries thereof.  The district shall be, and is hereby constituted, a legal political governmental subdivision and a body corporate. SECTION 24.  Section 37-29-553, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-553.  (1)  The * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall be under the executive direction of a president elected by the board of trustees of the district for a term not to exceed four (4) years. SECTION 25.  Section 37-29-555, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-555.  The president of the Mississippi Delta Community College district shall have the power to recommend to the trustees all teachers to be employed; and he may remove or suspend any member of the faculty subject to the approval of the trustees.  He shall be the general manager of all fiscal and administrative affairs of the district with full authority to select, direct, employ and discharge any and all employees other than teachers; however, the board may make provisions and establish policies for leave for faculty members and other key personnel. (2)  The president shall have the authority, subject to the provisions of Sections 37-29-551 through 37-29-569 and the approval of the trustees, to arrange and survey courses of study, fix schedules, and establish and enforce rules and discipline for the governing of teachers and students.  He shall be the general custodian of the property of the district. SECTION 26.  Section 37-29-557, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-557.  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Coahoma Community College District into the Mississippi Delta Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the operation and control of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall be vested in a board of trustees representing the counties lying within the district.  The board shall consist of * * *fourteen (14) seventeen (17) trustees selected in the manner provided in Section 1(2) of this act and Section 37-29-65(4) * * *, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 27.  Section 37-29-559, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-559.  (1)  The President and the Board of Trustees of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall have the powers to do all things necessary for the successful operation of the district and the campuses located therein. (2)  The college of the district shall be under the direction of the board of trustees and the president.  The board of trustees shall, by resolution or order, provide for the government, maintenance and operation of * * *the campus campuses of the district. (3)  The President and the Board of Trustees of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall have the same powers as the presidents and trustees of other community colleges in the State of Mississippi. (4)  The delineation and enumeration of the powers and purposes set out in Sections 37-29-551 through 37-29-569 shall be deemed to be supplemental and additional and shall not be construed to restrict the powers of the governing authorities of the district or of any college or campus located therein so as to deny any of the rights, privileges and powers enjoyed by other community/junior colleges and community/junior college districts in the State of Mississippi. (5)  The * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall remain subject to the jurisdiction of the Mississippi Community College Board as now established or as the same may be hereafter changed by law, and shall be subject to all rules and regulations and all statutory limitations which are now in effect or may hereafter be imposed, except as the same may be in direct conflict with the provisions of Sections 37-29-551 through 37-29-569. SECTION 28.  Section 37-29-561, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-561.  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Coahoma Community College District into the Mississippi Delta Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, the Board of Trustees of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall each year, on or before June 15, prepare a budget which shall contain a detailed estimate of the revenues and expenses anticipated for the ensuing year for general operation and maintenance, and shall set forth the reasonable requirements for anticipated needs for capital outlays for land, buildings, initial equipment for new buildings and major repairs, a reasonable accumulation for such purposes being hereby expressly authorized. SECTION 29.  Section 37-29-563, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-563.  The Board of Trustees of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall have the authority to purchase property, make capital improvements, and lease or use private or public facilities at the campus, in the discretion of the board. SECTION 30.  Section 37-29-565, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-565.  The * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District is charged with the responsibility for providing preprofessional courses, liberal arts, technical, vocational and adult education courses, and shall undertake to provide the same as conveniently as is possible to the residents of the district, and to this end the board of trustees is authorized and empowered to transport such students as, in its discretion, should be transported in the best interest of the district. SECTION 31.  Section 37-29-567, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-567.  The Board of Trustees of the * * *Coahoma Mississippi Delta Community College District shall have the general borrowing and bonding authority provided in Sections 37-29-101 through 37-29-127. The  board of trustees shall have the taxation authority provided in Sections 37-29-141 through 37-29-145. SECTION 32.  Section 37-29-569, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-569.  All of the property located in Coahoma County and belonging to the Board of Trustees of Mississippi Delta Community College prior to and as of the effective date hereof, cooperating in the Coahoma County Community College, and utilized or held for the present or future use and benefit of such community college, shall be and the same is hereby transferred to and vested in the * * *Coahoma County Mississippi Delta Community College District as created by Sections 37-29-551 through 37-29-569. SECTION 33.  Section 37-29-571, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-571.  (1)  All counties located within the Coahoma Community College District shall allocate fifty percent (50%) of any millage levied for the support and maintenance of community colleges by such county under Section 37-29-141, Mississippi Code of 1972, to the Coahoma Community College District and the remaining fifty percent (50%) of such millage to the other community college district in which such county is located.  Provided, however, that Coahoma County shall allocate one hundred percent (100%) of the millage levied for the support and maintenance of community colleges to the Coahoma Community College District.  Provided further, however, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1995, Tunica County's allocation of any millage shall be prorated with thirty-five percent (35%) being allocated to the Coahoma Community College District and the remaining sixty-five percent (65%) being allocated to the Northwest Community College District.  From and after July 1, 1996, the Tunica County millage shall be divided equally between the Coahoma Community College District and the Northwest Community College District. (2)  From and after July 1, 2027, when the consolidation of the Coahoma Community College District into the Mississippi Delta Community College District is effectuated as required under Section 1 of this act, this section shall be repealed. SECTION 34.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.